Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1977
Removal of directors by judicial proceeding.

(a) The district court of the county where a corporation's principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is located may remove any director of the corporation from office in a proceeding commenced either by the corporation, its members holding at least ten percent of the voting power of any class, or the Attorney General in the case of a public benefit corporation, if it finds that (1)(i) the director engaged in fraudulent or dishonest conduct, (ii) the director engaged in a gross abuse of authority or discretion, with respect to the corporation, or (iii) a final judgment has been entered finding that the director has violated a duty set forth in sections 21-1986 to 21-1989 and (2) removal is in the best interest of the corporation.

(b) The district court may bar the removed director from serving on the board for a period prescribed by the court.

(c) If members or the Attorney General commence a proceeding under subsection (a) of this section the corporation shall be made a party defendant.

(d) If a public benefit corporation or its members commence a proceeding under subsection (a) of this section, they shall give the Attorney General written notice of the proceeding.

(e) The articles or bylaws of a religious corporation may limit or prohibit the application of this section.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 77.

Effective notice to the Attorney General is an essential prerequisite to proceeding in any action involving a public benefit corporation for which such notice is required. Hitchcock Foundation v. Kountze, 272 Neb. 251, 720 N.W.2d 31 (2006).